Utah statutes.
30-8-5.   Effect of marriage -- Amendment -- Revocation.

(1)  A premarital agreement becomes effective upon marriage.

(2)  After marriage, a premarital agreement may be amended or revoked only by a written agreement signed by the parties.  The amended agreement or the revocation is enforceable without consideration.

